Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2781.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 232.142, subsection 6, paragraph b, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: b. (1) Moneys deposited in the juvenile detention home fund during a fiscal year are appropriated to the department for the same fiscal year for distribution of an amount equal to a percentage of the costs of the establishment, improvement, operation, and maintenance of county or multicounty juvenile detention homes in the prior immediately preceding fiscal year. Such percentage shall be determined by the department based on the amount available for distribution from the fund. (2) Moneys appropriated for distribution in accordance with this subsection shall be allocated among eligible detention homes, as follows: (a) One hundred fifty thousand dollars shall be distributed to each eligible county or multicounty juvenile detention home. (b) Appropriated moneys remaining after the distribution in subparagraph division (a) shall be prorated and distributed on the basis of an eligible county or multicounty juvenile detention homeâs proportion of the costs of all eligible House File 2781, p. 2 county or multicounty juvenile detention homes in the prior immediately preceding fiscal year. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2781, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor